North Carolina, session 2025, HB571.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Safety the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to assist the Department in establishing a grant program to treat police
officers who have been diagnosed with Posttraumatic Stress Disorder (PTSD).
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H571-v-1*